Colorado statutes. TITLE 28 Military and Veterans
ARTICLE 3.1
COLORADO CODE OF MILITARY JUSTICE

Editor's note:

Prior to the enactment of this article in 1983, the provisions concerning courts-martial were contained in part 10 of article 3 of this title, and the provisions concerning offenses were contained in part 11 of article 3 of this title.

Section

PART 1 GENERAL PROVISIONS

PART 2 COURTS-MARTIAL

PART 3 TRIAL PROCEDURE

PART 4 SENTENCES

PART 5 PUNITIVE ARTICLE

PART 6 MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS